exercise4/arabic_with_nouns1.xfst
clear stack

read lexc arabic_with_nouns1.lexc
define Lexicon ;
regex Lexicon ;

define Form2DoubleCons C -> b || b _ ?* FORM2 .o.
                       C -> t || t _ ?* FORM2 .o.
                       C -> y || y _ ?* FORM2 .o.
                       C -> k || k _ ?* FORM2 .o.
                       C -> l || l _ ?* FORM2 .o.
                       C -> m || m _ ?* FORM2 .o.
                       C -> n || n _ ?* FORM2 .o.
                       C -> f || f _ ?* FORM2 .o.
                       C -> w || w _ ?* FORM2 .o.
                       C -> r || r _ ?* FORM2 .o.
                       C -> z || z _ ?* FORM2 .o.
                       C -> d || d _ ?* FORM2 .o.
                       C -> s || s _ ?* FORM2 ;

define Form3DoubleVowelAct  V -> V V || _ ?* FORM3 ?* ACTIVE ;
define Form3DoubleVowelPass V -> V V || _ ?* FORM3 ?* PASSIVE ;

define ActiveVow1 V -> a || _ ?* ACTIVE ;
define ActiveVow2 W -> a || _ ?* ACTIVE ;

define PassiveVow1 V -> u || _ ?* PASSIVE ;
define PassiveVow2 W -> i || _ ?* PASSIVE ;

# Pattern 1: CaCiC (HUMAN + FORM3) → daaris / kaatib
define Noun1Vtoaa1   V -> a a || _ ?* HUMAN ?* FORM3 ;
define Noun1Vtoaa2   V -> a a || _ ?* FORM3 ?* HUMAN ;
define NounHumanWtoi W -> i  || _ ?* HUMAN ;

# Pattern 2: muCaCCiC (HUMAN + FORM2) → mudarris / mukattib
define Noun2Vtoa1   V ->  a || _ ?* HUMAN ?* FORM2 ;
define Noun2Vtoa2   V ->  a || _ ?* FORM2 ?* HUMAN ;

# Pattern 3: maCCaCa (PLACE) → madrasa / maktaba

define Noun3Vtoa V -> 0 || _ ?* PLACE ;
define Noun3Wtoa W -> a || _ ?* PLACE ;

# Combine noun-related rules
define NounRules Noun1Vtoaa1 .o. Noun1Vtoaa2 .o. NounHumanWtoi .o.
                 Noun2Vtoa1 .o. Noun2Vtoa2 .o.
                 Noun3Vtoa .o. Noun3Wtoa ;

define CleanUp C -> 0 .o.
               ACTIVE -> 0 .o.
               PASSIVE -> 0 .o.
               FORM1 -> 0 .o.
               FORM2 -> 0 .o.
               FORM3 -> 0 .o.
               HUMAN -> 0 .o.
               PLACE -> 0 ;

define LexiconWithRules Lexicon .o.
                        Form2DoubleCons .o. Form3DoubleVowelAct .o. Form3DoubleVowelPass .o.
                        ActiveVow1 .o. ActiveVow2 .o.
                        PassiveVow1 .o. PassiveVow2 .o.
                        NounRules .o.
                        CleanUp ;                       

regex LexiconWithRules ;

upper-words

lower-words
